Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.04.225

Contributions and gifts.

In the absence of an express prohibition in its articles of incorporation, the making of contributions or gifts for the public welfare, or for charitable, scientific, or educational purposes by a state bank is within its powers and shall be deemed to inure to the benefit of the bank.

[ 2014 c 37 s 123; 1986 c 279 s 11. Formerly RCW 30.04.225.]